voikko-fi/vvfst/poikkeavat.lexc
! Voikko-fi, suomen kielen muoto-opin kuvaus.
!
! Tekijänoikeus © 2006 - 2015 Hannu Väisänen (Etunimi.Sukunimi@joensuu.fi)
!                 2006 - 2015 Harri Pitkänen (hatapitk@iki.fi)
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
! it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation; either version 2, or (at your option)
! any later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
! WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
! MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
! General Public License for more details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
! along with this program; see the file COPYING.  If not, write to the
! Free Software Foundation, Inc., 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA
! 02110-1301, USA.

LEXICON Poikkeavat_a
[La][Xp]h[X]h%:eissa:h%:eissa	Liitesana_a	;
[La][Xp]h[X]h%:eineen:h%:eineen	Liitesana_a	;
[La][Xp]h[X]h%:eina:h%:eina	Liitesana_a	;
[La][Xp]khra[X]khra:khra	LyhenneIlmanTaivutusta_aä	; ! kirkkoherra
[La][Xp]klo[X]klo:klo	LyhenneIlmanTaivutusta_aä	; ! kello (sisälyhenne, ei taivuteta kaksoispisteen avulla)
[La][Xp]m[X]m%:eissä:m%:eissä	Liitesana_ä	;
[La][Xp]m[X]m%:eineen:m%:eineen	Liitesana_ä	;
[La][Xp]m[X]m%:einä:m%:einä	Liitesana_ä	;
[La][Xp]pj[X]pj:pj	LyhenneIlmanLoppua_aä	; ! puheenjohtaja
[La][Xp]s[X]s%:eissa:s%:eissa	Liitesana_a	;
[La][Xp]s[X]s%:eineen:s%:eineen	Liitesana_a	;
[La][Xp]s[X]s%:eina:s%:eina	Liitesana_a	;
[La][Xp]varapj[X]varapj:varapj	LyhenneIlmanLoppua_aä	; ! varapuheenjohtaja
[La][Xp]°C[X][Xr]jj[X]°c:°c	Lyhenne_a	;
[La][Xp]°F[X][Xr]jj[X]°f:°f	Lyhenne_a	;
[La][Xp]°K[X][Xr]jj[X]°k:°k	Lyhenne_a	;
[La][Xp]°[X]°:°	Lyhenne_a	;
[La][Xp]€[X]€:€	Lyhenne_a	;
[La][Xp]§[X]§:§	Lyhenne_ä	;
